District of Columbia statutes.
2-1326

Rules of procedure.

The Commission shall develop its own rules of procedure, except they shall provide the Commission shall meet at least every other month. The meetings shall be held in those areas of the District of Columbia with the largest concentration of Latino residents. All meetings shall be open to the public. A quorum to transact business shall consist of a majority plus 1 of the voting members.

Sept. 29, 1976, D.C. Law 1-86, title IV, § 406, 23 DCR 2543
1973 Ed., § 6-1926.
1981 Ed., § 1-2326.